Maryland, session 2026, HB1072.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
14–419.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “LOCAL VENDOR” MEANS A VENDOR LOCATED IN THE
6TH LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO STATE CONTRACTS RELATED TO THE
RECONSTRUCTION OF THE FRANCIS SCOTT KEY BRIDGE.
(C) A UNIT SHALL GIVE PREFERENCE IN THE PURCHASE OF SUPPLIES OR
SERVICES TO A LOCAL VENDOR AS REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS
SECTION.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1072*

HOUSE BILL 1072
(D) (1) IF A UNIT AWARDS A CONTRACT USING COMPETITIVE SEALED
BIDS UNDER § 13–103 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE UNIT SHALL AWARD THE CONTRACT TO
A LOCAL VENDOR IF THE LOCAL VENDOR:
(I) SUBMITS THE LOWEST RESPONSIVE BID; OR
(II) DOES NOT SUBMIT THE LOWEST RESPONSIVE BID, BUT THE
DIFFERENCE BETWEEN THE LOCAL VENDOR BID AND THE LOWEST RESPONSIVE BID
SUBMITTED BY A NONLOCAL VENDOR DOES NOT EXCEED 10%.
(2) IF A UNIT AWARDS A CONTRACT USING COMPETITIVE SEALED
PROPOSALS UNDER § 13–104 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE UNIT SHALL AWARD THE
CONTRACT TO A LOCAL VENDOR IF THE LOCAL VENDOR:
(I) SUBMITS THE RESPONSIVE PROPOSAL THAT IS MOST
ADVANTAGEOUS TO THE UNIT; OR
(II) DOES NOT SUBMIT THE RESPONSIVE PROPOSAL THAT IS
MOST ADVANTAGEOUS TO THE UNIT, BUT THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN THE
PROPOSAL SUBMITTED BY THE LOCAL VENDOR AND THE LOWEST RESPONSIVE
PROPOSAL SUBMITTED BY A NONLOCAL VENDOR DOES NOT EXCEED 10%.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.